Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-164] Complaints of wrongs. Any
member of the state military forces who believes the member's self wronged by
the member's commanding officer, and who, upon due application to that
commanding officer, is refused redress, may complain to any superior
commissioned officer, who shall forward the complaint to the governor or
adjutant general. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next